California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 were purchased. The first monthly remittance shall be made on or before the fifth day of the month and shall be equal to either one-half of the total amount of those purchases of stamps and meter register settings that were made during the preceding month or the total amount of those purchases of stamps and meter register settings that were made between the first day and the 15th day of the preceding month, whichever is greater. The second monthly remittance shall be made on or before the 25th day of the month for the remainder of those purchases of stamps and meter register settings that were made in the preceding month.

(3) If a distributor elects to make the payment required by subdivision (a) on a weekly basis, the distributor shall remit the payment on or before Wednesday following the week in which the stamps and meter register settings were approved and released. Every distributor electing to make payment on a weekly basis shall provide
 to the board and update, as necessary, an electronic mail address for the purpose of receiving payment information, including but not limited to, amounts owing for stamps and meter register settings purchased.

(c) Amounts owing for stamps and meter register settings purchased on the deferred-payment basis without a security pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 30142 shall be due and payable on or before Wednesday following the week in which the stamps and meter register settings were purchased. Payment shall be made by a remittance payable to the board.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 70, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2006, Ch. 501, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30169.

A distributor shall authorize in writing those persons who may order purchases of stamps or meter register settings for the account of the distributor at a location where stamps or meter register settings are sold. The authorization shall continue in effect until written notice of revocation of the authority is delivered at the sales location in such manner as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 884.)
-------------------------------------------

30170.

The board may suspend without prior notice a distributor’s privilege to purchase stamps or meter register settings on the deferred-payment basis or may reduce the amount of permissible deferred-payment purchases fixed for the distributor, if the distributor fails to promptly pay for stamps or meter register settings when payment is due, if the bond or bonds of the distrbutor are canceled, become void, impaired, or unenforceable for any reason, or if in the opinion of the board, collection of any amounts unpaid or due from the distributor under this part are jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

30171.

Any distributor who fails to pay any amount owing for the purchase of stamps or meter register settings within the time required, shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount due in addition to the amount plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the amount became due and payable until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1020, Sec. 30.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 65 of Ch. 1020.)
-------------------------------------------

30172.

The board for good cause may extend for not to exceed five days the time for paying any amount owing for stamps or meter register settings purchased on the deferred-payment basis provided a request for the extension is filed with the board within or prior to the period for which the extension may be granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 884.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Determinations [30173. - 30175.]

30173.

If a distributor fails to make payment for stamps or meter register settings when payment is due, the board may compute and determine from any available records and information the amount required to be paid, including interest and penalties. One or more determinations may be made of the amount due for one or for more than one purchase. In making a determination the board may offset overpayments with respect to purchases of stamps or meter register settings against underpayments for purchases and interest and penalties on the underpayments. The board shall give the distributor written notice of its determination in the manner provided by Section 30206. Except in the case
 of fraud, every notice of a determination made under this article shall be given within three years of the due date for payment of the purchase of stamps or a meter register setting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 884.)
-------------------------------------------

30174.

If the amount specified in the determination made under this article is not paid within 10 days after service of the notice upon the distributor, the determination becomes final unless a petition for redetermination is filed with the board within the 10-day period. The determination is due and payable when it becomes final and the amounts determined, exclusive of interest and penalties, shall bear interest at the rate prescribed by Section 30171.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 884.)
-------------------------------------------

30175.

The distributor against whom a determination is made under this article may petition for the redetermination thereof pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 30241) of Chapter 4. He or she shall, however, file the petition for redetermination within the time prescribed by Section 30174 and shall, at the time of filing the petition, deposit with the board such security as it may deem necessary to insure compliance with this part. The security may be sold in the same manner as prescribed by Section 30243.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 166.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Refunds [30176. - 30179.1.]

30176.

The board shall, pursuant to regulations prescribed by it, refund or credit to a distributor the denominated values, less the discount given on their purchase of any unused stamps or meter register settings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 884.)
-------------------------------------------

30176.1.

(a) The board shall, pursuant to regulations prescribed by it, refund or credit to a distributor the tax imposed on tobacco products pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 30121) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 30131) of Chapter 2 which is paid on the distribution of tobacco products which are shipped to a point outside the state for subsequent use or sale out of the state.

(b) This section does not apply to tobacco products delivered to the consumer in
 this state and subsequently taken outside the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

30176.2.

The board shall, pursuant to regulations prescribed by it, refund or credit to a distributor the tax imposed on tobacco products pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 30121) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 30131) of Chapter 2 that is paid on the distribution of tobacco products that were returned by a customer, when the distributor refunds the entire amount the customer paid for the tobacco products either in cash or credit. For purposes of this section, refund or credit of the entire amount shall be deemed to be given when the purchase price,
 less rehandling and restocking costs, is refunded or credited to the customer. The amount withheld for rehandling and restocking costs may be a percentage of the sales price determined by the average cost of rehandling and restocking returned merchandise during the previous accounting cycle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 426, Sec. 4.   Effective October 2, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

30177.

The board shall, pursuant to regulations prescribed by it, refund or credit to a distributor the denominated values, less the discount given on their purchase, of stamps or meter impressions affixed to packages of cigarettes which have prior to distribution become unfit for use, unsalable or have been destroyed, or which after distribution have become unfit for use or unsalable and have been returned
 for credit or have been replaced, and the board has proof of that return or destruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 426, Sec. 5.   Effective October 2, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

30177.5.

(a) The board shall credit to a distributor that is entitled to the credit authorized by paragraph (1) of subdivision (j) of Section 30165.1, the denominated value, less any discounts authorized by this part, of the stamps or meter impressions purchased and affixed to those packages of cigarettes that are subject to the provisions of subdivision (j) of Section 30165.1.

(b) The board shall credit to a distributor that is entitled to a credit authorized by paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (j) of Section 30165.1, the amount of taxes paid by that distributor, pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 30121) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 30131), with respect to the tobacco products that are subject to the provisions of subdivision (j) of Section 30165.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30178.

No refund or credit for amounts overpaid for the purchase of stamps or meter register settings shall be allowed or approved after three years from the due date for payment of the purchase for which the overpayment was made, or with respect to a determination made pursuant to this chapter, after six months from the date the determination becomes final, or after six months from the date of overpayment, whichever period expires the later, unless a claim therefor is filed with the board within such period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 884.)
-------------------------------------------

30178.1.

Any applications for a refund under Section 30176.1 based upon the exportation of tax-paid tobacco products from this state shall be filed with the board within three months after the close of the calendar month in which the tobacco products are exported.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 21.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30178.2.

In lieu of the refund of the tax on tobacco products pursuant to Section 30176.1 or Section 30176.2, a distributor eligible for that refund may elect to claim a credit against taxes imposed pursuant to this part equal to the amount which would have been refunded if a claim had been made pursuant to Section 30176.1 or Section 30176.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 426, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

30178.3.

Notwithstanding Section 30178, a refund of an overpayment of any tax, penalty, or interest collected by the board by means of levy, through the use of liens, or by other enforcement procedures, shall be approved if a claim for a refund is filed within three years of the date of an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 364, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30179.

Interest shall be computed, allowed, and paid upon any overpayment for the purchase of stamps or meter register settings at the modified adjusted rate per month established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the 26th day of the calendar month following the period during which the overpayment was made. In addition, a refund or credit shall be made of any interest imposed upon the claimant with respect to the amount being refunded or credited.

The interest shall be paid as follows:

(a) In the case of a refund, to the 25th day of the calendar month following the date upon which the claimant, if he or she has not already filed a claim, is notified by the board that a claim may be filed or the date upon which the claim is approved by the board, whichever date is earlier.

(b) In the case of a credit, to the same date as that to which interest is computed on the tax or amount against which the credit is applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

30179.1.

No interest shall be allowed on an overpayment of the tax on exported tobacco products which is refunded pursuant to Section 30176.1 or credited against taxes pursuant to Section 30178.2 within 90 days of the claim for the credit or refund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 23.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Other Provisions Applicable [30180. - 30180.]

30180.

Articles 2 (commencing with Section 30201), 3 (commencing with Section 30221), and 4 (commencing with Section 30241) of Chapter 4 and Sections 30185, 30362, and 30366 do not apply to amounts due or paid with respect to purchases made of stamps or meter register settings. The remedies of the state provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 30301) and the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 30361), except for Sections 30362 and 30366, apply to amounts due or paid with respect to purchases made of stamps or meter
 register settings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 9.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Determinations [30181. - 30285.]



  ARTICLE 1. Reports and Payments [30181. - 30188.]

30181.

(a) If any tax imposed upon cigarettes under this part is not paid through the use of stamps or meter impressions, the tax shall be due and payable monthly on or before the 25th day of the month following the calendar month in which a distribution of cigarettes occurs, or in the case of a sale of cigarettes on the facilities of a common carrier for which the tax is imposed pursuant to Section 30104, the tax shall be due and payable monthly on or before the 25th day of the month following the calendar month in which a sale of cigarettes on the facilities of the carrier occurs.

(b) Each distributor of tobacco products shall file a return using electronic media in the form, as prescribed by
 the
 department respecting the distributions of tobacco products and their wholesale cost during the preceding month, and any other information as the department may require to carry out this part. The return shall be filed with the department on or before the 25th day of the calendar month following the close of the monthly period for which it relates, together with a remittance payable to the department, of the amount of tax, if any, due under Article 2 (commencing with Section 30121) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 30131) of Chapter 2 for that period.

(c) To facilitate the administration of this part, the department may require the filing of the returns for longer than monthly periods.

(d) Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods
 as may be prescribed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 20.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

30182.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a distributor shall file, on or before the 25th day of each month, a report using electronic media in the form as prescribed by the department with respect to distributions of cigarettes and purchases of stamps and meter register units during the preceding month and any other information as the department may require to carry out this part.

(b) Reports shall be authenticated in a form, or pursuant to methods, as may be prescribed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 21.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

30183.

(a) On or before the 25th day of each month every distributor required under Section 30108 to collect any tax during the preceding month shall file a report with the department using electronic media in the form as prescribed by the department showing the number of cigarettes with respect to which
 the distributor was required to collect the tax and any other information as the department may require to carry out the purposes of this part. Reports shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(b) On or before the 25th day of each month, each distributor required to collect any tax during the preceding month pursuant to Section 30108 shall file a return using electronic media in the form as prescribed by the department that shows the wholesale cost of tobacco products with respect to which the distributor was required to collect the tax and any other information as the department may require to carry out this part. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 22.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

30184.

The distributor shall submit with each report or return a remittance payable to the board for the amount of tax due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 27.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30185.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) and otherwise provided in Section 30172, the board for good cause may extend for not to exceed one month the time for making any report or return or paying any amount of tax required under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the board within or prior to the period for which the extension may be
 granted.

(b) (1) In the case of a disaster, the board, for a period not to exceed three months, may extend the time for making any report or return or paying any tax required under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the board within or before the period for which the extension may be granted.

(2) For purposes of this section, “disaster” means fire, flood, storm, tidal wave, earthquake, or similar public calamity, whether or not resulting from natural causes.

(c) Any person to whom an extension is granted pursuant to this section shall pay, in addition to the amount of tax, interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the amount of tax would have been
 due without the extension to the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 257, Sec. 4.   (AB 1559)   Effective September 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

30185.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), if the Governor issues a state of emergency proclamation, the department may extend the time, for a period not to exceed three months, for making any report or return or paying any tax required under this part for any person in an area identified in the state of emergency proclamation.

(b) If the department makes an extension pursuant to subdivision (a), any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation shall not be required to file a request for the extension. 

(c) The department may make the extension in subdivision (a) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration
 of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 29.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30186.

On or before the 25th day of each month, the common carriers and authorized persons specified in Section 30104 shall file, using electronic media, with the department a report of the sales of cigarettes or tobacco products made by them on the facilities of the carriers in California in the preceding calendar month in that detail as the department may prescribe and in the form as prescribed by the department, submitting with the report the amount of the tax due under Section 30104. Reports shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 23.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

30187.

Every consumer or user subject to the tax resulting from a distribution of cigarettes or tobacco products within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 30008 from whom the tax has not been collected under Section 30108 shall, on or before the last day of the month following the end of the quarter, file, using electronic media, with the department a report of the amount of cigarettes or tobacco products received by
 that person in the preceding calendar quarter in that detail as the department may prescribe and in the form as prescribed by the department, submitting with the report the amount of tax due. Reports shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 24.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

30188.

On or before the 25th day of each month, every wholesaler shall file a report using electronic media in the form as prescribed by the department, respecting the wholesaler’s inventory, purchases, and sales of cigarettes or tobacco products during the preceding month and any other information as the department may require to carry out the purposes of this part. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 25.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.1. Payment by Electronic Funds Transfer [30190. - 30193.]

30190.

(a) Any person whose estimated tax liability under this part averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, as determined by the board pursuant to methods of calculation prescribed by the board, shall remit amounts due by an electronic funds transfer under procedures prescribed by the board.

(b) Any person whose estimated tax liability under this part averages less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per month may elect to remit
 amounts due by electronic funds transfer with the approval of the board.

(c) Any person remitting amounts due pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall perform electronic funds transfer in compliance with the due dates set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 30181). Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated, if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date settlement occurs.

(d) Any person remitting taxes by electronic funds transfer shall, on or before the due date of the remittance, file a return for the preceding reporting period in the form and manner prescribed by the board. Any
 person who fails to timely file the required return shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of taxes with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(e) Any person required to remit taxes pursuant to this article who remits those taxes by means other than appropriate electronic funds transfer shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the taxes incorrectly remitted.

(f) Any person who fails to pay any tax to the state or any amount of tax required to be collected and paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the board under Article 3 (commencing with Section 30173) or Article 2 (commencing with Section 30201) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 30221), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the tax or amount of tax, in addition to the tax or amount of tax, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction
 thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the tax became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(g) In determining whether a person’s estimated tax liability averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, the board may consider tax returns filed pursuant to this part and any other information in the board’s possession.

(h) The penalties imposed by subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the taxes due for any one return. Any person remitting taxes by electronic funds transfer shall be subject to the penalties under this section and not Section 30281.

(i) The board shall promulgate regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code for purposes of
 implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 10.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

30191.

If the board finds that a person’s failure to make payment by an appropriate electronic funds transfer in accordance with board procedures is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, that person shall be relieved of the penalty provided in subdivision (e) of Section 30190. Any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which he or she bases
 his or her claim for relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

30192.

(a) “Electronic funds transfer” means any transfer of funds, other than a transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is initiated through an electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, or computer or magnetic tape, so as to order, instruct, or authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an account. Electronic funds transfers shall be accomplished by an automated clearinghouse debit, an automated clearinghouse credit, or by Federal Reserve Wire Transfer (Fedwire).

(b) “Automated clearinghouse” means any federal reserve bank, or an organization established in agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or receiving entries between banks or bank accounts and which authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between these banks or bank accounts.

(c) “Automated clearinghouse debit” means a transaction in which the state, through its designated depository bank, originates an automated clearinghouse transaction debiting the person’s bank account and crediting the state’s bank account for the amount of tax. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse debit transaction shall be paid by the state.

(d) “Automated clearinghouse credit” means an automated clearinghouse transaction in which the person through
 his or her own bank, originates an entry crediting the state’s bank account and debiting his or her own bank account. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse credit transaction charged to the state shall be paid by the person originating the credit.

(e) “Fedwire transfer” means any transaction originated by a person and utilizing the national electronic payment system to transfer funds through the federal reserve banks, when that person debits his or her own bank account and credits the state’s bank account. Electronic funds transfers pursuant to Section 30190 may be made by Fedwire only if payment cannot, for good cause, be made according to subdivision (a), and the use of Fedwire is preapproved by the board. Banking costs incurred for the Fedwire transaction charged to the person and to the state shall be paid by the person originating the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

30193.

(a) Any return, report, declaration, statement, or other document required to be made under this part that is filed using electronic media shall be filed and authenticated pursuant to any method or form the board may prescribe.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any return declaration, statement, or other document otherwise required to be signed that is filed by the taxpayer using electronic media in a form as required by the board shall be deemed to be a signed, valid
 original document, including upon reproduction to paper form by the board.

(c) Electronic media includes, but is not limited to, computer modem, magnetic media, optical disk, facsimile machine, or telephone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Deficiency Determinations [30201. - 30208.]

30201.

If the board is dissatisfied with the report or return filed by any person, it may compute and determine the amount to be paid upon the basis of any information available to it. One or more deficiency determinations may be made of the amount of tax due for one or for more than one month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 31.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30202.

The amount of the determination, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date the amount of the tax, or any portion thereof, should have been reported until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1020, Sec. 33.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 65 of Ch. 1020.)
-------------------------------------------

30203.

In making a determination the board may offset overpayments for a month or months against underpayments for another month or months and against the interest and penalties on the underpayments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30204.

If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to negligence or intentional disregard of this part or the rules and regulations adopted under this part, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30205.

If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to fraud or an intent to evade this part or the rules and regulations adopted under this part, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30206.

The department shall give the person written notice of its determination. The notice shall be served in one of the following manners:

(a) By placing the notice in a sealed envelope, with postage paid, addressed to the person at their address as it appears in the records of the department. Service made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete at the time of deposit of the notice in the United States Post Office, or a mailbox, sub-post office, substation, or mail chute, or other facility regularly maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service, without extension of time for any reason.

(b) By personally delivering the notice to the person to be served. Service
 made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete at the time of such delivery. Personal service to a corporation may be made by delivery of a notice to any person designated in the Code of Civil Procedure to be served for the corporation with summons and complaint in a civil action.

(c) (1) By delivering the notice electronically via secure transmission when either of the following applies:

(A) The taxpayer requests the notice of determination to be sent electronically via secure transmission.

(B) The department has evidence that the taxpayer no longer receives mail at the address of record and has previously provided an address for electronic mail.

(2) Service provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed complete
 at the time the department electronically transmits the notice via the taxpayer’s secure web portal, without extension of time for any reason.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 34.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

30207.

Except in the case of fraud, intent to evade the tax, or failure to make a report or return, every notice of a deficiency determination shall be served within three years after the 25th day of the month following the month for which the amount should have been paid or the report or return was due, or within three years after the report or return was filed, whichever period expires later. In the case of failure to make a report or return, the notice of determination shall be served within eight years after the date the report or return was due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 35.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

30207.1.

In the case of a deficiency arising under this part during the lifetime of a decedent, a notice of deficiency determination shall be served within four months after written request therefor, in the form required by the department, by the fiduciary of the estate or trust or by any other person liable for the tax or any portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 36.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

30208.

If before the expiration of the time prescribed in Section 30207 for serving a notice of deficiency determination the taxpayer has consented in writing to the service of the notice after such time, the notice may be served at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 37.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Payment by Unlicensed Persons [30210. - 30215.]

30210.

If any person becomes a cigarette or tobacco products distributor without first securing a license, the tax, and applicable penalties and interest, if any, become immediately due and payable on account of all cigarettes or tobacco products distributed. All cigarettes or tobacco products manufactured in this state or transported to this state, and no longer in the possession of the unlicensed distributor, are considered to have been distributed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30211.

The board shall forthwith ascertain as best it may the amount of the cigarettes or tobacco products distributed and shall determine immediately the tax on that amount, adding to the tax a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of tax or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater, and shall give the unlicensed person notice of that determination per Section 30244 of the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Tax Law. However, where the board determines that the failure to secure a license was due to reasonable cause, the penalty may be waived. Sections 30242 and
 30243 shall be applicable with respect to the finality of the determination and the right of the unlicensed person to petition for a redetermination.

Any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the board a signed statement setting forth the facts upon which he or she bases the claim for relief. Any person who signs a statement pursuant to this section that asserts the truth of any material matter that he or she knows to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment of up to one year in the county jail, or a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both the imprisonment and the fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 82, Sec. 9.   Effective June 30, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30212.

The board shall forthwith collect the tax, penalty, and interest due from the unlicensed person by seizure and sale of property in the manner prescribed for the collection of a delinquent monthly tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30213.

In the suit, a copy of the jeopardy determination certified by the board shall be prima facie evidence that the unlicensed person is indebted to the state in the amount of the tax, penalties, and interest computed as prescribed by Section 30223.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30214.

The foregoing remedies of the state are cumulative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30215.

No action taken pursuant to this article relieves the unlicensed person in any way from the penal provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Determinations If No Report or Return Made [30221. - 30225.]

30221.

If any person fails to make a report or return, the board shall make an estimate of the number of cigarettes or the wholesale cost of tobacco products distributed by him or her. The estimate shall be made for the month or months in respect to which the person failed to make a report or return and shall be based upon any information available to the board. Upon the basis of this estimate the board shall compute and determine the amount required to be paid to the state, adding to the sum thus fixed a penalty equal to 10 percent thereof. One or more determinations may be made for one or for more than one
 month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 33.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30222.

In making a determination the board may offset overpayments for a month or months against underpayments for another month or months and against interest and penalties on the underpayments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30223.

The amount of the determination, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date the amount, or any portion thereof, should have been reported until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1020, Sec. 34.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 65 of Ch. 1020.)
-------------------------------------------

30224.

If the failure of a person to file a report is due to fraud or an intent to evade the tax, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount required to be paid by the person, exclusive of penalties, shall be added thereto in addition to the 10 percent penalty provided in Section 30221.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30225.
